Maryland, session 2025, HB0379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–455.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DRINK SPIKING DETECTION PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT THAT
HAS ONE OR MORE TEST SPOTS THAT ALLOW THE USER TO TEST A PORTION OF A
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0379*

HOUSE BILL 379
BEVERAGE TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE BEVERAGE HAS BEEN CONTAMINATED
WITH THE DRUG GAMMA–HYDROXYBUTYRIC ACID (GHB) OR KETAMINE.
(3) “DRUG DETECTION STRIP” MEANS A DISPOSABLE TEST STRIP
THAT ALLOWS AN INDIVIDUAL TO TEST A DRUG FOR THE PRESENCE OF FENTANYL.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(C) BEGINNING IN THE 2025–2026 SCHOOL YEAR, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL REQUIRE EACH PUBLIC MIDDLE SCHOOL
AND HIGH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY TO PROVIDE, AT NO CHARGE TO STUDENTS,
DRINK SPIKING DETECTION PRODUCTS AND DRUG DETECTION STRIPS.
(D) THE DRINK SPIKING DETECTION PRODUCTS AND DRUG DETECTION
STRIPS REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED TO MIDDLE AND HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE IN SCHOOL–BASED HEALTH
CLINICS, SCHOOL LIBRARIES, AND SCHOOL BATHROOMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.